Hawaii statutes.
§666-9 Return day. The summons shall
be returnable within such time as is fixed by the court in conformity with the
rules of court. [CC 1859, §942; am L 1923, c 119, §1; RL 1925, §2782; RL 1935,
§4019; RL 1945, §10408; RL 1955, §240-9; HRS §666-9; am L 1971, c 144, §31A]

Rules of Court

See DCRCP rule 12(a).

Case Notes

When summons not returnable as provided judgment void. 13 H.
450 (1901).

Defendant cannot be defaulted if defendant appears without
filing written pleadings. 14 H. 590, 592 (1903).

If last day falls on Sunday, summons may be made returnable
on Monday, the next legal day. 24 H. 250, 252-253 (1918).

Cited: 24 H. 95, 96 (1917).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next